utilities/dictionaries/mk_MK-Macedonian.aff
FLAG num
SFX 766 Y 1
SFX 766 0 ровска .
SFX 700 Y 1
SFX 700 0 ровски .
SFX 901 Y 1
SFX 901 0 раниов .
SFX 900 Y 1
SFX 900 0 ранион .
SFX 2509 Y 1
SFX 2509 0 јци .
SFX 318 Y 1
SFX 318 0 ров .
SFX 4346 Y 1
SFX 4346 0 рои .
SFX 4640 Y 1
SFX 4640 0 рок .
SFX 1001 Y 1
SFX 1001 0 рон .
SFX 3071 Y 1
SFX 3071 0 лениве .
SFX 4407 Y 1
SFX 4407 0 лошката .
SFX 3233 Y 1
SFX 3233 0 гнување .
SFX 2894 Y 1
SFX 2894 0 уша .
SFX 1617 Y 1
SFX 1617 0 уши .
SFX 3751 Y 1
SFX 3751 0 авине .
SFX 1167 Y 1
SFX 1167 0 телен .
SFX 4594 Y 1
SFX 4594 0 ниев .
SFX 1202 Y 1
SFX 1202 0 рската .
SFX 4578 Y 1
SFX 4578 0 пски .
SFX 1771 Y 1
SFX 1771 0 деново .
SFX 477 Y 1
SFX 477 0 рана .
SFX 454 Y 1
SFX 454 0 рани .
SFX 610 Y 1
SFX 610 0 рано .
SFX 3110 Y 1
SFX 3110 0 тнана .
SFX 895 Y 1
SFX 895 0 нувањено .
SFX 2366 Y 1
SFX 2366 0 торите .
SFX 913 Y 1
SFX 913 0 иравме .
SFX 4386 Y 1
SFX 4386 0 зираниот .
SFX 3203 Y 1
SFX 3203 0 сувајќи .
SFX 2262 Y 1
SFX 2262 0 дувањето .
SFX 111 Y 1
SFX 111 0 уваат .
SFX 2408 Y 1
SFX 2408 0 етува .
SFX 2451 Y 1
SFX 2451 0 нуваната .
SFX 3289 Y 1
SFX 3289 0 одите .
SFX 2823 Y 1
SFX 2823 0 шкиот .
SFX 1634 Y 1
SFX 1634 0 ковци .
SFX 3119 Y 1
SFX 3119 0 ривте .
SFX 4597 Y 1
SFX 4597 0 лоса .
SFX 4721 Y 1
SFX 4721 0 жуваново .
SFX 3282 Y 1
SFX 3282 0 суваа .
SFX 3281 Y 1
SFX 3281 0 сував .
SFX 3116 Y 1
SFX 3116 0 сувал .
SFX 3280 Y 1
SFX 3280 0 сувам .
SFX 4505 Y 1
SFX 4505 0 суван .
SFX 1951 Y 1
SFX 1951 0 етиов .
SFX 1950 Y 1
SFX 1950 0 етион .
SFX 3734 Y 1
SFX 3734 0 итите .
SFX 2475 Y 1
SFX 2475 0 овник .
SFX 2195 Y 1
SFX 2195 0 нетово .
SFX 4589 Y 1
SFX 4589 0 олна .
SFX 3333 Y 1
SFX 3333 0 олни .
SFX 4291 Y 1
SFX 4291 0 олно .
SFX 4123 Y 1
SFX 4123 0 овското .
SFX 1185 Y 1
SFX 1185 0 осување .
SFX 1400 Y 1
SFX 1400 0 дата .
SFX 301 Y 1
SFX 301 0 тиот .
SFX 768 Y 1
SFX 768 0 вањено .
SFX 2417 Y 1
SFX 2417 0 нтот .
SFX 3589 Y 1
SFX 3589 0 бена .
SFX 3357 Y 1
SFX 3357 0 бени .
SFX 3356 Y 1
SFX 3356 0 бено .
SFX 2755 Y 1
SFX 2755 0 екс .
SFX 1788 Y 1
SFX 1788 0 девме .
SFX 2425 Y 1
SFX 2425 0 алец .
SFX 4434 Y 1
SFX 4434 0 тирања .
SFX 1595 Y 1
SFX 1595 0 тирање .
SFX 4417 Y 1
SFX 4417 0 ерските .
SFX 2686 Y 1
SFX 2686 0 рувате .
SFX 30 Y 1
SFX 30 0 ата .
SFX 354 Y 1
SFX 354 0 ате .
SFX 620 Y 1
SFX 620 0 ати .
SFX 1532 Y 1
SFX 1532 0 ато .
SFX 1412 Y 1
SFX 1412 0 сниот .
SFX 429 Y 1
SFX 429 0 рите .
SFX 4701 Y 1
SFX 4701 0 суваниов .
SFX 4700 Y 1
SFX 4700 0 суванион .
SFX 2693 Y 1
SFX 2693 0 ичкиов .
SFX 2692 Y 1
SFX 2692 0 ичкион .
SFX 4158 Y 1
SFX 4158 0 шаново .
SFX 1585 Y 1
SFX 1585 0 каа .
SFX 708 Y 1
SFX 708 0 кав .
SFX 1359 Y 1
SFX 1359 0 кал .
SFX 2109 Y 1
SFX 2109 0 кам .
SFX 1381 Y 1
SFX 1381 0 кан .
SFX 3034 Y 1
SFX 3034 0 пувањето .
SFX 1711 Y 1
SFX 1711 0 тните .
SFX 4119 Y 1
SFX 4119 0 телните .
SFX 1940 Y 1
SFX 1940 0 аноска .
SFX 1709 Y 1
SFX 1709 0 аноски .
SFX 2765 Y 1
SFX 2765 0 чувањана .
SFX 1230 Y 1
SFX 1230 0 ична .
SFX 1047 Y 1
SFX 1047 0 ични .
SFX 1015 Y 1
SFX 1015 0 ично .
SFX 4143 Y 1
SFX 4143 0 арсконо .
SFX 1610 Y 1
SFX 1610 0 зите .
SFX 2881 Y 1
SFX 2881 0 грам .
SFX 3166 Y 1
SFX 3166 0 инец .
SFX 4838 Y 1
SFX 4838 0 ивајќи .
SFX 4115 Y 1
SFX 4115 0 жувањана .
SFX 4774 Y 1
SFX 4774 0 екувате .
SFX 3909 Y 1
SFX 3909 0 тизмот .
SFX 3065 Y 1
SFX 3065 0 лската .
SFX 795 Y 1
SFX 795 0 тка .
SFX 1756 Y 1
SFX 1756 0 тки .
SFX 2643 Y 1
SFX 2643 0 тко .
SFX 4754 Y 1
SFX 4754 0 тивната .
SFX 3200 Y 1
SFX 3200 0 тичкиот .
SFX 393 Y 1
SFX 393 0 уваната .
SFX 2884 Y 1
SFX 2884 0 ашев .
SFX 4323 Y 1
SFX 4323 0 ашен .
SFX 3039 Y 1
SFX 3039 0 дневниот .
SFX 491 Y 1
SFX 491 0 ството .
SFX 2422 Y 1
SFX 2422 0 ение .
SFX 1173 Y 1
SFX 1173 0 еник .
SFX 4919 Y 1
SFX 4919 0 илова .
SFX 2587 Y 1
SFX 2587 0 стика .
SFX 744 Y 1
SFX 744 0 вања .
SFX 331 Y 1
SFX 331 0 вање .
SFX 2898 Y 1
SFX 2898 0 жиш .
SFX 3192 Y 1
SFX 3192 0 годишнина .
SFX 2952 Y 1
SFX 2952 0 тоска .
SFX 2951 Y 1
SFX 2951 0 тоски .
SFX 1934 Y 1
SFX 1934 0 тичност .
SFX 2732 Y 1
SFX 2732 0 елов .
SFX 4693 Y 1
SFX 4693 0 тирањава .
SFX 4785 Y 1
SFX 4785 0 вувајте .
SFX 1786 Y 1
SFX 1786 0 кнува .
SFX 4769 Y 1
SFX 4769 0 изирања .
SFX 807 Y 1
SFX 807 0 изирање .
SFX 1972 Y 1
SFX 1972 0 жеше .
SFX 4715 Y 1
SFX 4715 0 лувањава .
SFX 4878 Y 1
SFX 4878 0 јуваа .
SFX 2912 Y 1
SFX 2912 0 рувањено .
SFX 3364 Y 1
SFX 3364 0 њак .
SFX 4234 Y 1
SFX 4234 0 мниот .
SFX 4936 Y 1
SFX 4936 0 ажете .
SFX 3858 Y 1
SFX 3858 0 чуванине .
SFX 4934 Y 1
SFX 4934 0 антен .
SFX 2341 Y 1
SFX 2341 0 гне .
SFX 2756 Y 1
SFX 2756 0 гни .
SFX 1505 Y 1
SFX 1505 0 лу .
SFX 2080 Y 1
SFX 2080 0 метар .
SFX 1668 Y 1
SFX 1668 0 адува .
SFX 4582 Y 1
SFX 4582 0 пата .
SFX 2147 Y 1
SFX 2147 0 пати .
SFX 2822 Y 1
SFX 2822 0 џиите .
SFX 3084 Y 1
SFX 3084 0 жувате .
SFX 4592 Y 1
SFX 4592 0 одов .
SFX 4726 Y 1
SFX 4726 0 жуванине .
SFX 3795 Y 1
SFX 3795 0 ечам .
SFX 2489 Y 1
SFX 2489 0 мена .
SFX 1639 Y 1
SFX 1639 0 мени .
SFX 2990 Y 1
SFX 2990 0 мено .
SFX 1138 Y 1
SFX 1138 0 навте .
SFX 4554 Y 1
SFX 4554 0 алски .
SFX 3877 Y 1
SFX 3877 0 тувавте .
SFX 4186 Y 1
SFX 4186 0 лувате .
SFX 1146 Y 1
SFX 1146 0 сов .
SFX 3823 Y 1
SFX 3823 0 сок .
SFX 4073 Y 1
SFX 4073 0 сол .
SFX 865 Y 1
SFX 865 0 сон .
SFX 2281 Y 1
SFX 2281 0 рскава .
SFX 533 Y 1
SFX 533 0 рат .
SFX 615 Y 1
SFX 615 0 ираше .
SFX 4642 Y 1
SFX 4642 0 рач .
SFX 880 Y 1
SFX 880 0 раш .
SFX 773 Y 1
SFX 773 0 рај .
SFX 3618 Y 1
SFX 3618 0 џа .
SFX 3028 Y 1
SFX 3028 0 џи .
SFX 1989 Y 1
SFX 1989 0 ола .
SFX 1021 Y 1
SFX 1021 0 оли .
SFX 2698 Y 1
SFX 2698 0 јниот .
SFX 3456 Y 1
SFX 3456 0 сенана .
SFX 4679 Y 1
SFX 4679 0 екувањето .
SFX 1521 Y 1
SFX 1521 0 ушка .
SFX 4948 Y 1
SFX 4948 0 ушки .
SFX 789 Y 1
SFX 789 0 носка .
SFX 724 Y 1
SFX 724 0 носки .
SFX 3036 Y 1
SFX 3036 0 дувањево .
SFX 4478 Y 1
SFX 4478 0 бената .
SFX 3191 Y 1
SFX 3191 0 ологијата .
SFX 3528 Y 1
SFX 3528 0 зното .
SFX 3975 Y 1
SFX 3975 0 зевте .
SFX 2453 Y 1
SFX 2453 0 нуванава .
SFX 4588 Y 1
SFX 4588 0 орам .
SFX 3687 Y 1
SFX 3687 0 низмот .
SFX 1908 Y 1
SFX 1908 0 лика .
SFX 3214 Y 1
SFX 3214 0 ничкана .
SFX 2569 Y 1
SFX 2569 0 ачките .
SFX 2949 Y 1
SFX 2949 0 чанец .
SFX 2804 Y 1
SFX 2804 0 жената .
SFX 3668 Y 1
SFX 3668 0 шанине .
SFX 2028 Y 1
SFX 2028 0 онот .
SFX 174 Y 1
SFX 174 0 евме .
SFX 175 Y 1
SFX 175 0 евте .
SFX 3480 Y 1
SFX 3480 0 ечките .
SFX 2689 Y 1
SFX 2689 0 лената .
SFX 384 Y 1
SFX 384 0 ењето .
SFX 2880 Y 1
SFX 2880 0 дава .
SFX 1432 Y 1
SFX 1432 0 штата .
SFX 3133 Y 1
SFX 3133 0 ејува .
SFX 3743 Y 1
SFX 3743 0 атори .
SFX 4988 Y 1
SFX 4988 0 ерна .
SFX 4313 Y 1
SFX 4313 0 ерни .
SFX 488 Y 1
SFX 488 0 чкана .
SFX 2275 Y 1
SFX 2275 0 рсконо .
SFX 4542 Y 1
SFX 4542 0 живме .
SFX 1085 Y 1
SFX 1085 0 енка .
SFX 4314 Y 1
SFX 4314 0 енки .
SFX 1642 Y 1
SFX 1642 0 енко .
SFX 36 Y 1
SFX 36 0 ава .
SFX 949 Y 1
SFX 949 0 ави .
SFX 1862 Y 1
SFX 1862 0 аво .
SFX 4803 Y 1
SFX 4803 0 умниот .
SFX 1399 Y 1
SFX 1399 0 дија .
SFX 1239 Y 1
SFX 1239 0 иката .
SFX 2986 Y 1
SFX 2986 0 рива .
SFX 1118 Y 1
SFX 1118 0 риве .
SFX 3395 Y 1
SFX 3395 0 пувањево .
SFX 3109 Y 1
SFX 3109 0 тниве .
SFX 3061 Y 1
SFX 3061 0 сените .
SFX 3649 Y 1
SFX 3649 0 шувавте .
SFX 800 Y 1
SFX 800 0 раната .
SFX 1525 Y 1
SFX 1525 0 ијат .
SFX 3093 Y 1
SFX 3093 0 венана .
SFX 4707 Y 1
SFX 4707 0 стичкото .
SFX 4261 Y 1
SFX 4261 0 апува .
SFX 2445 Y 1
SFX 2445 0 нуваноно .
SFX 93 Y 1
SFX 93 0 ија .
SFX 1132 Y 1
SFX 1132 0 ије .
SFX 1586 Y 1
SFX 1586 0 ијо .
SFX 2550 Y 1
SFX 2550 0 торски .
SFX 4611 Y 1
SFX 4611 0 зиве .
SFX 4735 Y 1
SFX 4735 0 дуваното .
SFX 1759 Y 1
SFX 1759 0 лав .
SFX 556 Y 1
SFX 556 0 лак .
SFX 2108 Y 1
SFX 2108 0 лам .
SFX 2336 Y 1
SFX 2336 0 лан .
SFX 4953 Y 1
SFX 4953 0 сата .
SFX 840 Y 1
SFX 840 0 иците .
SFX 406 Y 1
SFX 406 0 уванава .
SFX 2372 Y 1
SFX 2372 0 осниот .
SFX 3700 Y 1
SFX 3700 0 дираат .
SFX 3001 Y 1
SFX 3001 0 вила .
SFX 3806 Y 1
SFX 3806 0 виле .
SFX 2736 Y 1
SFX 2736 0 вило .
SFX 1476 Y 1
SFX 1476 0 нс .
SFX 815 Y 1
SFX 815 0 нт .
SFX 1765 Y 1
SFX 1765 0 ну .
SFX 4100 Y 1
SFX 4100 0 нц .
SFX 2845 Y 1
SFX 2845 0 егнат .
SFX 2284 Y 1
SFX 2284 0 кањето .
SFX 3910 Y 1
SFX 3910 0 тарски .
