utilities/dictionaries/mk_MK-Macedonian.dic
нев/2,7,24,70,141,152,173,178,179,194,197,224,288,362,411,465,533,628,663,759,959,1001,1021,1085,1087,1094,1331,1343,1447,1533,1575,1642,1836,1989,2037,2097,2171,2212,2215,2216,2285,2311,2329,2519,2591,2594,2595,2648,2740,3050,3127,3333,3378,4213,4291,4421,4444,4511,4589,4820
бла/4,11,27,203,357,373,411,548,557,757,776,815,935,991,999,1022,1025,1233,1528,1687,2085,2258,2761,3822,4295,4386
сми/7,10,25,27,110,194,331,429,459,515,519,533,628,931,992,1033,1123,1244,1436,1496,1557,1605,1735,1768,1783,1796,1846,1905,1965,1966,2078,2079,2229,2282,2328,2371,2416,2486,2557,2789,2790,2791,2792,2793,2794,2795,2796,2868,3062,3119,3120,4073,4666,4812
заш/7,9,11,25,36,80,107,108,121,131,390,566,569,881,914,1521,1635,1750,1799,1924,1973,2408,2664,2865,3556,3557
плав/107,108,121,131,728,1163,1617,2639,2894
етно/11,110,382,1089,1596,1633,1674,2476,2767,2961,3216,3463,3729,4406,4407
мети/1524,1759,3017,4597
банд/154,164,288,290,352,452,629,728,1133,1141,1301,1313,1325,1462,1508,1518,1533,1606,1624,2622,3613,3621,3734,4260,4919,4920
помо/21,26,28,293,395,523,729,738,883,1162,1215,1248,1261,1289,1311,1314,1347,1380,1410,1561,1608,1646,1647,1651,1661,1684,1745,1847,1909,2005,2108,2207,2315,2559,2576,2618,2689,2718,2727,2728,2801,3066,3067,3068,3069,3070,3071,3072,3073,3181,3291,3292,3578,3782,4086,4602,4947,4995
сват/3,6,13,14,81,87,89,93,94,101,106,111,148,197,214,232,262,269,293,326,338,922,1049,1084,1185,1623,1722,3843
полк/300,314,315,2475,3461
колк/314,315,2301,2412,2850,3751,3752,4263,4938
разб/317,378,452,454,477,550,568,610,646,664,697,723,741,800,803,808,838,860,884,885,886,887,898,899,900,901,1328,1384,1654,1829,1834,1908,2311,2340,2360,2403,2431,2613,2623,2919,3171,3176,3244,3343,3344,3556,3568,3676,3829,3885,3986,3989,4047,4048,4070,4346,4350,4577,4584
раск/317,628,955,1182,1557,1735,1809,1908,1924,1988,1990,2171,2347,2475,2746,2869,2950,2958,2986,3118,3368,3524,3774,3781,3914,3962,3963,4020,4176,4294,4344,4346,4512,4574
моми/345,453,471,472,700,766,1713,2213,3511,4078,4640
божа/5,27,203,240,255,318,328,361,365,366,369,386,461,515,672,674,676,700,766,771,804,855,928,944,985,1031,1048,1088,1131,1182,1204,1205,1296,1377,1409,1569,1653,1713,1894,2981,3320,3759,4007
гало/500,1939,3158,3915,4091,4439,4578
прог/641,1738,1858,2106,4594
март/961,1085,2357,2772,3210,3265,4123,4358
раков/1498,3289,3569,3570,3780,4292
бомба/2291,2470,2823,2862,4069
цурак/2894
напре/377,562,589,648,813,856,872,891,938,1161,1547,1763,2054,2159,2241,2341,2410,2482,2500,2756,2882,3233,3234,3309,3349,3350,3351,3352,3353,3587
замав/4,5,15,35,191,233,241,251,258,259,289,295,297,322,650,665,666,684,685,740,742,743,760,788,799,801,802,819,820,821,823,824,827,839,848,849,850,857,858,861,862,866,895,896,910,915,919,920,968,987,1023,1100,1138,1308
опера/623,998,1112,1176,1435,1645,1808,1946,2077,2128,2211,2356,2366,3102,3114,3277,3721,4752,4753,4754
преви/7,10,54,61,70,80,102,140,287,302,308,324,331,342,457,613,655,678,689,749,903,984,1028,1092,1158,1197,1256,1473,1678,1688,2262,3823
попов/90,182,194,1511,2311,3333,4291,4444,4589,4820
добров/2311,3333,4291,4444,4589,4820
борина/318,672,676,700,766
вратов/321,553,1202,1247
изрежи/378,477
разден/7,13,21,80,94,101,102,106,111,143,152,161,163,165,171,174,175,197,199,214,215,216,217,219,220,225,226,227,228,229,230,231,235,237,238,239,242,243,261,267,268,269,282,283,300,311,338,340,389,410,467,569,588,1140,1415,1517,1548,1549,1665,1832,1833,1948,1949,1950,1951
допинг/94,111,351,364,487,611
попрост/2,3,9,21,23,26,28,30,34,36,38,42,43,44,45,610
лиценци/3,140,287,291,302,333,378,420,454,621,646
комплет/3,5,6,8,21,25,27,35,47,51,52,55,70,90,109,189,209,294,296,473,518,549,615,616,686,702,716,725,913
бомбаши/321,553,672,676,700,766
самоуби/7,10,22,31,32,54,59,61,70,80,85,102,177,182,331,342,457,491,657,678,1014,1568,2402,2509,2658,2931,3447,3912,4376,4491
ослободи/1,12,19,22,31,32,33,37,39,40,59,413,693,1081,1167,1319,1566,2009,2292,2828,4119
априлија/1400
срамежлив/2,3,9,21,23,26,28,30,34,36,38,42,43,44,45,50,69,85,91,153,177,1634
